test/src/morphology/N-keeratwb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kēratõb: # Noun 159 'eng /est kirjuti/fin' - full paradigm
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Nom: kēratõb
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Gen: kēratõb
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Par: kēratõbt
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Dat: kēratõbõn
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Ins: kēratõbõks
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Ill: kēratõbõ
     kēratõb+N+Sg+Ela: kēratõbst
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Nom: kēratõbõd
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Gen: kēratõbõd
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Par: kēratõbidi
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Dat: kēratõbõdõn
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Ins: kēratõbõdõks
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Ill: kēratõbiž
     kēratõb+N+Pl+Ela: kēratõbist
